inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VAI_IND_oo.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nimaajiibatoo
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg: gimaajiibatoo
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: nimaajiibatoomin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl: gimaajiibatoomin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl: gimaajiibatoom
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: maajiibatoo
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: maajiibatoowag
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: maajiibatoowan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: [maajiibatoowan,maajiibatoowa']
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X: maajiibatoom
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg: [nimaajiibatoosiin,nimaajiibatoosii]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg: [gimaajiibatoosiin,gimaajiibatoosii]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl: nimaajiibatoosiimin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl: gimaajiibatoosiimin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl: gimaajiibatoosiim
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: [maajiibatoosiin,maajiibatoosii]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: maajiibatoosiiwag
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: maajiibatoosiiwan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: [maajiibatoosiiwan,maajiibatoosiiwa']
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X: maajiibatoosiim
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg: nimaajiibatoonaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg: gimaajiibatoonaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl: nimaajiibatoominaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl: gimaajiibatoominaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl: gimaajiibatoomwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: maajiibatooban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: [maajiibatoobaniig,maajiibatoobaneg]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: [maajiibatoobaniin,maajiibatoobanen]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: [maajiibatoobaniin,maajiibatoobanen]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X: maajiibatoomwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg: nimaajiibatoosiinaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg: gimaajiibatoosiinaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl: nimaajiibatoosiiminaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl: gimaajiibatoosiiminaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl: gimaajiibatoosiimwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: maajiibatoosiiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: [maajiibatoosiibaniig,maajiibatoosiibaneg]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: [maajiibatoosiibaniin,maajiibatoosiibanen]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: [maajiibatoosiibaniin,maajiibatoosiibanen]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X: maajiibatoosiimwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg: nimaajiibatoonaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg: gimaajiibatoonaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl: nimaajiibatoominaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl: gimaajiibatoominaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl: gimaajiibatoomwaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: maajiibatoodog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: maajiibatoodogenag
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: maajiibatoodogenan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: [maajiibatoodogenan,maajiibatoodogena']
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X: maajiibatoomwaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg: nimaajiibatoosiinaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg: gimaajiibatoosiinaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl: nimaajiibatoosiiminaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl: gimaajiibatoosiiminaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl: gimaajiibatoosiimwaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: maajiibatoosiidog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: maajiibatoosiidogenag
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: maajiibatoosiidogenan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: [maajiibatoosiidogenan,maajiibatoosiidogena']
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X: maajiibatoosiimwaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: maajiibatoogoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: maajiibatoogwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: maajiibatoonigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: maajiibatoosiigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: maajiibatoosiigwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: maajiibatoosiinigoban
